District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.35k

Maintenance of documents.

Copies of the specimen Bonds and of the final Financing Documents and Closing Documents shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of the District of Columbia.

June 21, 2014, D.C. Law 20-110, § 210, 61 DCR 4315